Yamls/Pron-kynym-nibudj_gt-norm.yaml
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: кынымныс
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: кынымнысӧ
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: кынымныслӧн
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: кынымныслісь
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: кынымныслӧ
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: кынымнаныс 
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com+PxPl3: кынымныскӧт
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Car+PxPl3: [кынымныстӧг, кынымтӧгьяныс]
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: кынымнысла
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: кынымнысся
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: кыныманыс
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: кынымсиныс
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: кыныманыс
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [кынымныслань, кынымланяныс]
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [кынымныссянь, кынымсяняныс]
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [кынымӧттяныс, кынымӧттиныс]
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [кынымӧдззаныс, кынымӧдззиныс]
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: кынымнысви
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: [кынымланяныс, кынымнысланьын]
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: [кынымланьсиныс, кынымнысланись]
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: [кынымланяныс, кынымнысланьӧ]
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [кынымнысланьсянь, кынымланьсяняныс] 
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [кынымнысланьӧт, кынымланьӧттяныс, кынымланьӧттиныс]
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [кынымнысланьӧдз, кынымланьӧдззаныс, кынымланьӧдззиныс]
    кыным+Pron+Rel+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: кынымнысланьви
